District of Columbia statutes.
28-3908

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of this chapter, and the application of such provision to other persons not similarly situated or to other circumstances, shall not be affected.

July 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-76, § 9, 23 DCR 1185
enacted, Sept. 6, 1980, D.C. Law 3-85, § 3(a), (d), 27 DCR 2900
1981 Ed., § 28-3908.
1973 Ed., T. 28, Appx., § 9.